Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103B.101, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. Pollinator account created. An account is created in the special revenue fund to support pollinators. Money may be deposited in the account only as required by law. Money in the account is deleted text begin annually appropriateddeleted text end new text begin available for appropriationnew text end to the Board of Water and Soil Resources for activities that support pollinator habitat. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103B.104, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-02318 103B.104 LAWNS TO LEGUMES PROGRAM. (a) The Board of Water and Soil Resources may provide financial and technical assistance to plant residential landscapes and community spaces with native vegetation and pollinator-friendly forbs and legumes to: (1) protect a diversity of pollinators with declining populations; and (2) provide additional benefits for water management, carbon sequestration, and landscape and climate resiliency. (b) The board must establish criteria for grants or payments awarded under this section. Grants or payments awarded under this section may give priority consideration for proposals in areas identified by the United States Fish and Wildlife Service as areas where there is a high potential for rusty patched bumble bees and other priority species to be present. (c) The board may collaborate with and enter into agreements with federal, state, and local agencies; Tribal Nations; nonprofit organizations; and contractors to implement and promote the program. (d) Data on individuals who apply for or receive financial or technical assistance to plant residential landscapes or community spaces under the program are classified as private data on individuals, as defined by section 13.02, subdivision 12. Section 13.05, subdivision 11, applies to an agreement between the board and a private person to implement the program.